Utah statutes.
78B-15-606.   No limitation -- Child having no declarant or adjudicated father.

A proceeding to adjudicate the parentage of a child having no declarant or adjudicated father may be commenced at any time.  If initiated after the child becomes an adult, only the child may initiate the proceeding.

